District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0482.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
be cited as the “DC Youth Links App Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this title, the term:
(1) “Economic hardship” means circumstances that significantly hinder an
individual's ability to access or sustain employment opportunities and shall include the following
conditions: homelessness or housing instability; lack of a high school diploma or general
education development test or not being on track to complete a high school diploma or general
education development test; pregnancy or parenting youth; current or prior involvement in the
juvenile or criminal legal systems; living with a disability; or being within or aging out of the
foster care system.
(2) “Smartphone” means an electronic device capable of Internet access, data
storage, and communication features through text, email, and similar digital functionalities.


(3) “Smartphone application” means a software program developed to operate on
a smartphone with specific functionalities or services, including data processing, communication,
Internet access, and access to online resources.
(4) “Youth” means an individual who is at least 14 years of age and under 24
years of age.
(5) “Youth participant” means any youth who has provided informed consent and
has registered and created an account on the smartphone application.
Sec. 3. Establishment of a smartphone application and website for youth employment.
(a) The Deputy Mayor for Education (“DME”) shall hire a contractor to establish a
centralized platform to directly connect youth to paid employment opportunities called DC
Youth Links, which shall be administered by the DME. DME shall oversee the development and
operation of DC Youth Links and streamline employment pathways and reduce barriers to
workforce entry for District youth.
(b) DME shall have the authority to issue grants or enter into contracts or partnership
agreements for the development of DC Youth Links.
(c) DC Youth Links shall be accessible through a smartphone application and through a
publicly accessible website. The smartphone application and website shall:
(1) Maintain a centralized platform of paid employment opportunities for District
youth;
(2) Provide users the ability to filter employment opportunities by:
(A) Skills required;
(B) Hourly wage;
(C) Location; and


(D) Hours available.
(3) Provide users the ability to apply for employment opportunities through the
app and website;
(4) Feature a feedback tool for youth and employers to rate their experience;
(5) Collect and report data to DME pursuant to section 5 of this Act; and
(6) Comply with federal and District data privacy standards.
Sec. 4. Requirements and eligibility.
(a) DME shall:
(1) Require employers to complete training on applicable federal and District
labor laws, including the Fair Labor Standards Act, the Minimum Wage Act Revision Act of
1992, effective March 25, 1993 (D.C. Law 9-248; D.C. Official Code § 32-1003 et al), the Child
Labor Amendments Act of 1976 (D.C. Law 1-68; D.C. Official Code § 32-201 et al), workplace
safety standards outlined in the Occupational Safety and Health Act, and relevant reporting
requirements, prior to accessing DC Youth Links;
(2) Develop terms and conditions of use for employers, employer onboarding, and
job postings;
(3) Create an agreement for all participating employers to adhere to the terms and
conditions, including paragraph (1) of this subsection;
(4) Implement a vetting process to evaluate and approve new employers;
(5) Recruit employers located in all eight wards, offering opportunities that are
suitable for youth employment and prioritizing opportunities that are public transit accessible;
and
(6) Develop and implement a public engagement campaign to promote youth


participation, including strategies to engage youth experiencing economic hardship.
(b) Employers shall:
(1) Be licensed to do business in the District;
(2) Respond to workplace abuse reports within 5 business days, unless more
immediate attention is warranted;
(3) Provide information on youth labor laws and training on workplace
expectations to youth participants; and
(4) Comply with any other requirements deemed appropriate by DME.
(c) Eligible youth participants shall be District residents.
Sec. 5. Reporting requirements.
(a) On October 1 of the year after the establishment of DC Youth Links, and annually
thereafter, the DME shall publish on its website the following information regarding DC Youth
Links for the previous year:
(1) Total number of youth accounts created on DC Youth Links, disaggregated by
age, sex, race/ethnicity, ward of residence, and individuals with disabilities;
(2) Total number of employers participating in DC Youth Links, categorized by
industry, location, average length of employment, average wage, and number of youth employed;
and
(3) The total number of youth participants placed in employment opportunities,
disaggregated by:
(A) Job type categorized by full-time, part-time, or internship;
(B) Employer industry;
100 (C) Average length of employment;


101 (D) Average hourly wage or total earnings of youth participants; and
102 (E) Job site location;
103 (5) The average time between a youth participant creating an account and
104 securing a job placement;
105 (6) Number of reports of workplace abuse, safety violations, skill mismatches,
106 and employer resolution; and
107 (7) Feedback from employers and youth participants on the quality of job matches
108 and youth readiness.
109 Sec. 6. Fiscal impact statement.
110 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
111 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
112 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
113 Sec. 7. Effective date.
114 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
115 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
116 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
117 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
118 Columbia Register.